Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 2. Investigation by Fire Marshal

§ 2861.
Generally.

When it may seem to be for the public good, the Fire Marshal shall personally visit and investigate any fire in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and shall be repaid for any related expenses out of the funds appropriated to the Division of Fire Safety.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 177.

§ 2862.
Assistance of State’s Attorney in investigation.

Upon request of the Fire Marshal or the Deputy Fire Marshal, a State’s Attorney shall assist such officers in an investigation of a fire that in their opinion is of suspicious origin.

§ 2863.
Entry on premises.

The Fire Marshal and his or her assistants, upon complaint duly made, shall have authority to enter, at all reasonable hours, into and upon all buildings and premises within their jurisdiction for the purposes of examination in the performance of their duties.

§ 2864.
Attendance of witnesses; production of documents.

The Fire Marshal and the Deputy Fire Marshal, or either of them, may summon and compel the attendance of witnesses to testify relative to any matter that is subject to an inquiry or investigation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and may require the production of any book, paper, or document that they deem pertinent to the inquiry or investigation. Witnesses shall be subpoenaed in the same manner as witnesses in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court and a person shall not be excused from appearing before the Fire Marshal or Deputy Fire Marshal when summoned to appear. A witness shall receive the same compensation as is paid in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, which shall be paid out of the Fire Prevention and Building Inspection Special Fund upon vouchers signed by the Fire Marshal or Deputy Fire Marshal before whom the witnesses appeared. At the close of the investigation for which the witnesses were subpoenaed the officer shall certify to their attendance and mileage and the certificate shall be filed in the Office of the Fire Marshal.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2021, No. 20

, § 178.

§ 2865.
Privacy of hearings.

All investigations held by or under the direction of the Fire Marshal or Deputy Fire Marshal may, in his or her discretion, be private.
Persons other than those required to be present by the provisions of this chapter may be excluded from the place where such investigation is held.
Witnesses may be kept separate and apart from each other and not allowed to communicate with each other until they have been examined.

§ 2866.
Testimony under oath.

When in his or her opinion further investigation is necessary, the Fire Marshal shall take or cause to be taken the testimony under oath of all persons supposed to have knowledge of any facts or to have means of knowledge relating to any fire or matter regarding which an examination is required to be made pursuant to this chapter, and he or she shall cause the testimony to be reduced to writing.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 179.

§ 2867.
Administration of oaths; perjury.

The Fire Marshal and Deputy Fire Marshal may each administer oaths and affirmations to any person appearing as a witness before them.
A person who falsely swears in any matter or proceeding shall be deemed guilty of perjury and shall be punished accordingly.

§ 2868.
Contempt.

A witness may be punished as for contempt of court who:

refuses to obey a summons of the Fire Marshal or Deputy Fire Marshal; or

refuses to be sworn or to testify; or

disobeys a lawful order of the Fire Marshal or Deputy Fire Marshal in relation to an investigation instituted by him or her; or

fails or refuses to produce any book, paper, or document relating to any matter under investigation or examination; or

is guilty of any contemptuous act after being summoned to appear before the Fire Marshal or Deputy Fire Marshal to give testimony relating to any matter under examination or investigation.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 180.

§ 2869.
Prosecution.

After making such investigation, if the Fire Marshal or Deputy Fire Marshal is of the opinion that there is probable cause to believe a person guilty of the crime of arson, or of an attempt to commit the crime of arson, or of a conspiracy to defraud, or any criminal conduct in connection with such fires, he or she shall furnish to the State’s Attorney a copy of all such testimony together with the names and residences of witnesses and all necessary information obtained by him or her.
Such State’s Attorney shall take such action as the facts justify and diligently inquire into all circumstances attending the fire.
The Fire Marshal may assist in the prosecution either in person or by the Deputy Fire Marshal.